New York, session 2025-2026, A3437.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 2 391-vv to read as follows: 3 § 391-vv. Dynamic pricing by food service establishments prohibited. 4 1. For the purposes of this section: 5 (a) "Food service establishment" shall have the same meaning as such 6 term is defined in section three hundred ninety-one-v of this article. 7 (b) "Dynamic pricing" means the practice of fluctuating prices based 8 on demand, the season, or other factors, including, but not limited to, 9 artificial intelligence-enabled pricing adjustments. 10 2. No food service establishment shall use a dynamic pricing model in 11 determining the prices on its menu. Such prices on a food service estab- 12 lishment's menu shall remain fixed and be posted for all menu items. 13 3. A food service establishment's failure to comply with the 14 provisions of this section shall result in a penalty of one thousand 15 dollars for each day it is not in compliance with the provisions of this 16 section. If such penalties exceed a total of fifty thousand dollars in a 17 calendar year, the following may occur: 18 (a) the attorney general is authorized to enforce the provisions of 19 this section, including, but not limited to, further penalties at the 20 attorney general's discretion; or 21 (b) revocation of such food service establishment's permit at the 22 discretion of the local health department. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06696-01-5